Idaho statutes. Title 39 HEALTH AND SAFETY
Chapter 13 HOSPITAL LICENSES AND INSPECTION
§ 39-1392a. Definitions.

The following terms shall have the following meanings when used in this section:

“Emergency medical services personnel” means emergency medical services providers certified by the department of health and welfare pursuant to section 56-1011 et seq., Idaho Code, and ambulance-based clinicians as defined in the rules governing emergency medical services as promulgated by the department of health and welfare.

“Group medical practice” means a partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or other association formed for the purpose of offering health care services through physicians and other licensed or otherwise authorized health care providers who are partners, shareholders, members, employees, or contractors of such group medical practice.

“Health care organization” means a hospital, in-hospital medical staff committee, medical society, managed care organization, licensed emergency medical service, group medical practice, residential care facility or skilled nursing facility.

“Hospital” means a facility in Idaho licensed under sections 39-1301 through 39-1314, Idaho Code, and defined in section 39-1301(a)(1), Idaho Code.

“In-hospital medical staff committees” means any individual doctor who is a hospital staff member, or any hospital employee, or any group of such doctors and/or hospital employees, who are duly designated a committee by hospital staff bylaws, by action of an organized hospital staff, or by action of the board of directors of a hospital, and which committee is authorized by said bylaws, staff or board of directors, to conduct research or study of hospital patient cases, or of medical questions or problems using data and information from hospital patient cases.

“Licensed emergency medical service” means an ambulance service or a nontransport service licensed by the department of health and welfare pursuant to section 56-1011 et seq., Idaho Code.

“Managed care organization” means a public or private person or organization which offers a managed care plan.

“Managed care plan” means a contract of coverage given to an individual, family or group of covered individuals pursuant to which a member is entitled to receive a defined set of health care benefits through an organized system of health care providers in exchange for defined consideration and which requires the member to use, or creates financial incentives for the member to use, health care providers owned, managed, employed by or under contract with the managed care organization.

“Medical society” means any duly constituted, authorized and recognized professional society or entity made up of physicians licensed to practice medicine in Idaho, having as its purpose the maintenance of high quality in the standards of health care provided in Idaho or any region or segment of the state, operating with the approval of the Idaho state board of medicine, or any official committee appointed by the Idaho state board of medicine.

“Patient care records” means written or otherwise recorded, preserved and maintained records of the medical or surgical diagnostic, clinical, or therapeutic care of any patient treated by or under the direction of licensed professional personnel, including emergency medical services personnel, in every health care organization subject to this act, whether as an inpatient or outpatient of the health care organization.

“Peer review” means the collection, interpretation and analysis of data by a health care organization for the purpose of bettering the system of delivery of health care or to improve the provision of health care or to otherwise reduce patient morbidity and mortality and improve the quality of patient care. Peer review activities by a health care organization include, without limitation:
(a) Credentialing, privileging or affiliating of health care providers as members of, or providers for, a health care organization;

“Peer review records” means all evidence of interviews, reports, statements, minutes, memoranda, notes, investigative graphs and compilations and the contents thereof, and all physical materials relating to peer review of any health care organization. “Peer review records” does not mean or include patient care records; provided however, that the records relating to the identification of which particular patient care records were selected for, or reviewed, examined or discussed in peer review by a health care organization and the methodology used for selecting such records shall be considered peer review records.

“Skilled nursing facility” means a facility licensed under chapter 13, title 39, Idaho Code, to provide skilled care to recipients.

(b) Quality assurance and improvement, patient safety investigations and analysis, patient adverse outcome reviews, and root-cause analysis and investigation activities by a health care organization; and

(c) Professional review action, meaning an action or recommendation of a health care organization which is taken or made in the conduct of peer review, that is based on the competence or professional conduct of an individual physician or emergency medical services personnel where such conduct adversely affects or could adversely affect the health or welfare of a patient or the physician’s privileges, employment or membership in the health care organization or in the case of emergency medical services personnel, the emergency medical services personnel’s scope of practice, employment or membership in the health care organization.

§ 39-1392b. Records confidential and privileged.

Except as provided in section 39-1392e, Idaho Code, all peer review records shall be confidential and privileged, and shall not be directly or indirectly subject to subpoena or discovery proceedings or be admitted as evidence, nor shall testimony relating thereto be admitted in evidence, or in any action of any kind in any court or before any administrative body, agency or person for any purpose whatsoever. No order of censure, suspension or revocation of licensure, or of a certification in the case of emergency medical services personnel, or health care organization privilege of any physician licensed to practice medicine in Idaho shall be admissible in any civil proceeding seeking damages or other civil relief against the physician, emergency medical services personnel, or health care organization which may be a defendant in said cause. However, this section shall not prohibit or otherwise affect the use of documents, materials or testimony in health care organization proceedings, nor shall it prohibit or otherwise affect the dissemination, for medical purposes, of information contained in such documents or materials or the conclusions and findings of such health care organization. This section shall not affect the admissibility in evidence in any action or proceeding of the patient care records of any patient.

§ 39-1392c. Immunity from civil liability.

The furnishing of information or provision of opinions to any health care organization or the receiving and use of such information and opinions shall not subject any health care organization or other person to any liability or action for money damages or other legal or equitable relief. Custodians of such records and persons becoming aware of such data and opinions shall not disclose the same except as authorized by rules adopted by the board of medicine or as otherwise authorized by law. Any health care organization may receive such disclosures, subject to an obligation to preserve the confidential privileged character thereof and subject further to the requirement that such requests shall be made and such use shall be limited to aid the health care organization in conducting peer review.

§ 39-1392d. Property of health care organization.

All peer review records of a health care organization shall be the property of the health care organization concerned which obtains or compiles the same. A health care organization may provide peer review records to persons or entities that perform accreditation, certification or quality assurance review or evaluation of the health care organization. The provision of any peer review records to such persons or entities shall not be deemed to be a waiver by the health care organization of any peer review privilege. Persons and entities receiving peer review records shall preserve the confidential privileged character thereof and such persons and entities shall not be subject to subpoena or order compelling production of peer review records. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to require the health care organization to provide persons or entities with peer review records. A health care organization may provide peer review records to persons or entities with whom the health care organization is affiliated through any common ownership interest or by contract, which affiliation or contract includes the person’s or entity’s involvement in the peer review process or the provision of any management or administrative services to the health care organization. The provision of peer review records to such persons or entities shall not be deemed to be a waiver by the health care organization of any peer review privilege. Such persons and entities receiving peer review records shall preserve the confidential privileged character thereof, and such persons and entities shall not be subject to any subpoena or order compelling production of peer review records. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to require the health care organization to provide such persons or entities with peer review records. This section shall in no way impair the rights of individuals conducting such research or studies in the exercise of any right or the discharge of any legitimate responsibility which they may have in connection with such research or studies and the results thereof. Nothing in this act shall be construed as restricting or altering the rights of inspection and copying by patients and their duly authorized representatives with respect to such patients’ official patient care records, which right of copying and inspection and use of patient care records and their contents in appropriate judicial proceedings is unaltered by this enactment.

§ 39-1392e. Limited exceptions to privilege and confidentiality.

In the event of a claim or civil action against a physician, emergency medical services personnel, a hospital, a residential care facility or a skilled nursing facility arising out of a particular physician-patient, emergency medical services personnel-patient, hospital-patient, residential care facility-patient or skilled nursing facility-patient relationship, or which concerns the sufficiency of the delivery of particular health care to a specific patient, any health care organization having information of the kind covered by section 39-1392b, Idaho Code, shall, when interrogated as hereinafter provided, advise any such claimant who is or was such a patient or who, in a representative capacity, acts on behalf of such patient or his heirs, as follows:

Whether it has conducted or has in progress an inquiry, proceeding or disciplinary matter regarding the quality or propriety of the health care involved, which concerns the subject patient while he was under the care or responsibility of a member of such health care organization or while he was a patient in such hospital or facility; and, if so,

Whether disposition of any kind resulted or will result therefrom; and, if so,

What the disposition was, or, if not yet determined, approximately when it will be determined.

Such a claimant shall likewise be entitled to inquire of such health care organization respecting the names and addresses of persons who such health care organization knows to have direct knowledge of the provision of the health care in question, such inquiry to be limited, however, to the particular patient and the particular times and occasions germane to the specific occurrences on which the claim is based; provided, names shall not be disclosed respecting persons who have gained secondary knowledge or formed opinions respecting the matter solely by participating as witnesses, officials, investigators or otherwise on, for, or in connection with such a health care organization committee, staff, governing board or the state board of medicine.

Such limited, conditional discovery and disclosure of information as provided above shall be allowed only in response to inquiries directed to such a health care organization, and then only if initially propounded by a claimant of the type above described. If the matter is in litigation, inquiry may be by customary means of discovery under the Idaho rules of civil procedure, or, if pending in a United States court, then under discovery as allowed by its applicable rules; provided, pendency of the claim in the United States court or before any other tribunal shall not operate to broaden the exception to the rules of privilege, confidentiality and immunity set down in this act.

Such disclosures may be voluntarily made without judicial order or formal discovery if all disciplined, accused or investigated physicians or emergency medical services personnel consent thereto, and if privileged or confidential information regarding any other patient, physician, emergency medical services personnel, or person will not be disclosed thereby. When the terms of this paragraph are complied with, such voluntary disclosures may be made without civil liability therefor as if in due response to valid judicial process or order.

If any claimant makes such inquiry of any such health care organization, he shall be deemed to have consented to like inquiry and disclosure rights for the benefit of all parties against whom he asserts such claim or brings such suit or action, and all other persons who are parties to such action, and thereafter all such persons and parties may invoke the provisions of this section, seeking and securing specific information as herein provided for the benefit of such claimant, to the same extent as the same is allowed to such claimant.

If any physician, emergency medical services personnel, patient, person, organization or entity whose conduct, care, chart, behavior, health or standards of ethics or professional practice is the subject of investigation, comment, testimony, dispositive order of any kind or other written or verbal utterance or publication or act of any such health care organization or any member or committee thereof in the course of research, study, disciplinary proceeding or investigation of the sort contemplated by this act, makes claim or brings suit on account of such health care organization activity, then, in the defense thereof, confidentiality and privilege shall be deemed waived by the making of such claim, and such health care organization and the members of their staffs and committees shall be allowed to use and resort to such otherwise protected information for the purpose of presenting proof of the facts surrounding such matter, and this provision shall apply whether such claim be for equitable or legal relief or for intentional or unintentional tort of any kind and whether pressed by a patient, physician, emergency medical services personnel, or any other person, but such waiver shall only be effective in connection with the disposition or litigation of such claim, and the court shall, in its discretion, enter appropriate orders protecting, and as fully as it reasonably can do so, preserving the confidentiality of such materials and information.

Such disclosure of information shall be limited to the health care organization’s actions in connection with the physician, emergency medical services personnel, hospital or skilled nursing facility against whom such claim is asserted.

§ 39-1392f. Peer review.

Every hospital subject to this act shall cause the hospital’s medical staff to organize in-hospital medical staff committees which shall have the responsibility of reviewing the professional practices of members of the hospital’s medical staff for the purpose of reducing morbidity and mortality, and for the improvement of the care of patients in the hospital. This review shall include, but not be limited to, the quality and necessity of care provided to patients.

§ 39-1392g. Medical staff membership and privileges.

Except as specifically provided in subsection (2) of this section, nothing in this section shall in any way change the authority of the governing body of any health care organization to make such rules, regulations, standards or qualifications for medical staff membership as it, in its discretion, may deem necessary or advisable, or to grant or refuse membership on a medical staff.

An applicant for medical staff membership or privileges in a health care organization that has an organized medical staff, an applicant for reappointment to the medical staff of such health care organization, or a current member of the medical staff of such health care organization shall not be denied medical staff membership or privileges, nor shall membership or privileges be withdrawn, revoked, suspended or limited by such health care organization for the reason that:

The applicant or current member of the medical staff holds an ownership interest in one (1) or more competing health care organizations;

The applicant or current member of the medical staff is affiliated with one (1) or more competing health care organizations; or

The applicant or current member of the medical staff is a competitor of one (1) or more members of the medical staff.

Nothing in this section shall require a health care organization to grant privileges to an applicant for services that are subject to an exclusive contract or not offered in that facility.

Nothing in this section shall be interpreted as changing the privilege, confidentiality, discoverability and admissibility of the information and records granted in section 39-1392b, Idaho Code.

§ 39-1393. Notification of professional review action imposed upon physician or emergency medical services personnel.

Any health care organization in this state that is by law required to conduct peer review or which voluntarily formally elects to conduct professional review actions shall notify the board of medicine of professional review actions taken against physicians licensed in Idaho required to be reported as provided in this section. Such reports shall be made to the board of medicine within fifteen (15) days of completion of the professional review action by the health care organization. For emergency medical services personnel, such reports shall be made to the department of health and welfare within fifteen (15) days of completion of the professional review action by the health care organization. Such required reports shall be made on forms approved by the board of medicine for reports concerning physicians, or the department of health and welfare for reports concerning emergency medical services personnel, consistent with the reporting requirements of this section. The reporting obligation shall not be stayed by the filing of any court proceeding unless otherwise ordered by the court.

A health care organization in Idaho shall report to the board of medicine if it:

Takes a professional review action against a physician licensed in Idaho and imposes a sanction of the type included in subsection (3) of this section which lasts longer than thirty (30) days; or

Accepts a voluntary sanction by a physician licensed in Idaho of the type identified in subsection (3) of this section while the physician is under investigation or to avoid investigation by the health care organization relating to the professional competence or professional conduct of the physician or in exchange for the health care organization not conducting such an investigation or initiating a professional review action, if the sanction lasts longer than thirty (30) days.

Professional review action sanctions against a physician which must be reported to the board of medicine pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, whether voluntary or involuntary, shall be:

Restriction or limitation of privileges;

Revocation of privileges;

Suspension of privileges;

Reduction of privileges;

Denial of a request for initial privileges;

Submission to monitoring of the physician’s physical or mental condition;

Submission to monitoring of the physician’s delivery of medical services other than to assess and monitor the physician’s qualifications for new or additional privileges;

Surrender of privileges;

Summary suspension or reduction of privileges lasting longer than thirty (30) days;

Termination of employment;

Suspension of employment lasting longer than thirty (30) days.

The reporting requirements of this section shall not apply to:

Actions based on compliance with medical records or confidentiality requirements of a health care organization;

Voluntary requests for assistance or monitoring by a physician as part of an educational process to improve physician skills or enhance patient care when unrelated to a professional review action concerning the quality or necessity of patient medical care;

Voluntary or involuntary revocation, nonrenewal, denial, reduction, restriction, resignation, or limitation of privileges or employment of a physician based upon factors not directly impacting the quality of patient care or safety of practice of the physician;

Adverse actions taken against a physician by a health care organization that is not required by law to conduct peer review and that has not voluntarily formally elected to conduct professional review actions; and

The denial of a physician’s request for additional privileges or credentials with a health care organization.

The report to the board of medicine required by this section shall include a statement of the quality of care concerns or professional conduct that is the basis of the professional review action or investigation and the reportable professional review action sanction voluntarily accepted or involuntarily imposed.

A health care organization required to report a professional review action concerning a physician to the board of medicine pursuant to this section shall, if requested by the board of medicine, provide to the board the following:

A statement of the specific quality of care concerns or professional conduct which resulted in the professional review action sanction;

A statement of the specific professional review action sanction; and

Any patient care records of the health care organization regarding the care provided by the reported physician. However, the board of medicine may not request or require production of any peer review records from any person or health care organization, including the identification of which particular patient care records were selected for, or reviewed, examined or discussed in any peer review activity of a health care organization, or the method used by the health care organization to select such patient care records for peer review.

The records lawfully requested by the board of medicine pursuant to subsection (6) of this section shall be provided by the health care organization without a subpoena or court order. If the health care organization fails to comply with the board of medicine’s lawful request, the board may petition the district court for an order compelling compliance with the board’s request, which shall be granted if disclosure is required by law.

Professional review action sanctions against emergency medical services personnel, whether voluntary or involuntary, which are the result of any action, conduct, or failure to act which is inconsistent with the professionalism and/or standards established in the rules governing emergency medical services personnel as promulgated by the department of health and welfare must be reported to the department of health and welfare.

The report to the department of health and welfare required by this section shall include a statement of the quality of care concerns or professional conduct that is the basis of the professional review action or investigation and the reportable professional review action sanction voluntarily accepted or involuntarily imposed.
(10) Any person or health care organization that provides notification as required by law, or in a good faith belief that such notification is required by law, shall be immune from any civil or other liability arising from providing the notification. Such immunity shall likewise pertain to the provision of files, records and information a health care organization may in good faith provide to the board of medicine pursuant to this section or other applicable law. Such materials provided to the board of medicine shall be subject to disclosure by the board according to chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code, and available only to the board of medicine and its staff unless and until such matter becomes the subject of formal proceedings by or before the board of medicine or authorized by it.

§ 39-1394. Patient care records — Retention — Authentication.

Retention.

Hospital records relating to the care and treatment of a patient may be preserved in microfilm, other photographically reproduced form or electronic medium. Such reproduced and preserved copies shall be deemed originals for purposes of section 9-420, Idaho Code.

Clinical laboratory test records and reports may be destroyed five (5) years after the date of the test recorded or reported therein, pursuant to paragraph (d) of this subsection.

X-ray films may be destroyed five (5) years after the date of exposure, or five (5) years after the patient reaches the age of majority, whichever is later, pursuant to paragraph (d) of this subsection, if there are in the hospital record written findings of a physician who has read such x-ray films.

At any time after the retention periods specified in paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection, the hospital may, without thereby incurring liability, destroy such records, by burning, shredding or other effective method in keeping with the confidential nature of their contents, provided, however, that destruction of such records must be in the ordinary course of business and no record shall be destroyed on an individual basis.

For purposes of this section, the term “hospital” shall include all facilities defined as hospitals in chapter 13, title 39, Idaho Code.

Authentication.

Hospital records relating to orders for the care and treatment of a patient or for the administration of any drug or pharmaceutical must be authenticated to ensure accuracy and patient safety.

All orders must be authenticated by the author of the order or another practitioner who is responsible for the care of the patient and who is authorized to write orders by hospital policy in accordance with state law.

When telephone or oral orders must be used, they must be:

Accepted only by personnel authorized to do so by medical staff policies and procedures, consistent with federal and state law; and

Each hospital must have in place policies and mechanisms to assure timely authentication of all orders and to assure that only the author of an order or another practitioner who is responsible for the care of the patient and who is authorized to write orders by hospital policy in accordance with state law can authenticate the order.

(d) Authentication may occur either manually, with the practitioner’s signature, or electronically by facsimile transmission signed by the practitioner or by means of a unique electronic code known only to the practitioner.

§ 39-1395. Practice of podiatry — Medical staff membership.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, no provision or provisions of this section shall in any way change or modify the authority or power of the governing body of any hospital to make such rules, standards or qualifications for medical staff membership as they, in their discretion, may deem necessary or advisable, or to grant or refuse membership on a medical staff.

An applicant for medical staff membership may not be denied membership solely on the ground that the applicant holds a license to practice podiatry issued by the Idaho state board of podiatry. The criteria utilized for granting medical staff membership shall be reasonable and shall not discriminate against podiatry.

The process for considering applications for medical staff membership and privileges shall afford each applicant due process.

All applications for medical staff membership shall be acted upon within one hundred twenty (120) days from the date the required information is submitted.

The accordance and delineation of clinical privileges for podiatrists shall be determined on an individual basis and commensurate with the applicant’s education, training, experience and demonstrated competence. In implementing these procedures, each hospital shall formulate and apply reasonable standards that do not discriminate in the evaluation of an applicant’s credentials.

A member of the medical staff licensed pursuant to chapter 18, title 54, Idaho Code, shall have responsibility for the overall medical care of the patient while in the hospital. Arrangements for the services of a member of the medical staff licensed pursuant to chapter 18, title 54, Idaho Code, for the purposes of this section shall be the sole responsibility of the admitting podiatrist and not that of the hospital or any other member of the medical staff.

§ 39-1396. Authority to admit patients.

A hospital or facility may grant to physicians, physician assistants and advanced practice nurses the privilege to admit patients to such hospital or facility; provided however, that admitting privileges may be granted only if the privileges are:

Recommended by the medical staff at the hospital or facility;

Approved by the governing board of the hospital or facility; and

Within the scope of practice conferred by the license of the physician, physician assistant or advanced practice nurse.

A hospital or facility shall specify in its bylaws the process by which its governing body and medical staff oversee those practitioners granted admitting privileges. Such oversight shall include, but is not limited to, credentialing and competency review.

§ 39-1346B. Treasurer of hospital — Investment limitations.